California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1517, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.12.

This article shall be operative only in those counties in which the county board of supervisors, by resolution, authorizes its application and, by resolution, makes a finding that any additional costs incurred by the county in the implementation of this article are funded either by new funding sufficient to cover the costs incurred by the county resulting from this article, or funds redirected from cost savings resulting from this article, or a combination thereof, so that no current service reductions will occur as a result of the enactment of this article. Compliance with this section shall be monitored by the State Department of
 Health Care Services as part of its review and approval of mental health plans and performance contracts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 84.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.15.

(a) Upon the completion of a 14-day period of intensive treatment pursuant to Section 5250, the person may be certified for an additional period of not more than 30 days of intensive treatment under both of the following conditions:

(1) The professional staff of the agency or facility treating the person has found that the person remains gravely disabled as a result of a mental disorder or impairment by chronic alcoholism.

(2) The person remains unwilling or unable to accept treatment voluntarily.

(b) A person certified for an additional 30 days pursuant to this article shall be provided a certification review hearing in accordance with
 Section 5256 unless a judicial review is requested pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 5275).

(1) Reasonable attempts shall be made by the mental health facility to notify family members or any other person designated by the patient at least 36 hours before the certification review hearing, of the time and place of the certification hearing, unless the patient requests that this information not be provided. The patient shall be advised by the facility that is treating the patient that he or she has the right to request that this information not be provided.

(2) The professional staff of the agency or facility providing intensive treatment shall analyze the person’s condition at intervals not to exceed 10 days, to determine whether the person continues to meet the criteria established for certification under this section, and shall daily monitor the person’s treatment
 plan and progress. Termination of this certification before the 30th day shall be made pursuant to Section 5270.35.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 225.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.20.

(a) For a person to be certified under this article, a second notice of certification shall be signed by the professional person in charge of the facility providing intensive treatment to the person and by either a physician who shall, if possible, be a board-qualified psychiatrist, or a licensed psychologist who has a doctoral degree in psychology and at least five years of postgraduate experience in the diagnosis and treatment of emotional and mental disorders. The physician or psychologist who signs shall have participated in the evaluation and finding referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 5270.15.

(b) If the professional person in charge is the physician who performed the medical evaluation and finding, or a psychologist, the second person to sign may be another physician or psychologist unless one is not available, in which case a social worker, licensed marriage and family therapist, licensed professional clinical counselor,
 or registered nurse who participated in the evaluation and finding shall sign the notice of certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 184, Sec. 3.   (AB 191)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.25.

A second notice of certification is required for all involuntary intensive treatment, pursuant to this article, and shall be in substantially the form indicated in Section 5252.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1517, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.30.

Copies of the second notice of certification as set forth in Section 5270.25, shall be filed with the court and personally delivered to the person certified. A copy shall also be sent to the person’s attorney, to the district attorney, to the public defender, if any, and to the facility providing intensive treatment.

The person certified shall also be asked to designate any individual who is to be sent a copy of the certification notice. If the person certified is incapable of making the designation at the time of certification, that person shall be given another opportunity to designate when able to do
 so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1517, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.35.

(a) A certification pursuant to this article shall be for no more than 30 days of intensive treatment, and shall terminate only as soon as the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment believes, as a result of the psychiatrist’s personal observations, that the person no longer meets the criteria for the certification, or is prepared to voluntarily accept treatment on a referral basis or to remain on a voluntary basis in the facility providing intensive treatment. However, in those situations in which both a psychiatrist
 and psychologist have personally evaluated or examined a person who is undergoing intensive treatment and there is a collaborative treatment relationship between the psychiatrist and the psychologist, either the psychiatrist or psychologist may authorize the release of the person but only after they have consulted with one another. In the event of a clinical or professional disagreement regarding the early release of a person who is undergoing intensive treatment, the person may not be released unless the facility’s medical director overrules the decision of the psychiatrist or psychologist opposing the release. Both the psychiatrist and psychologist shall enter their findings, concerns, or objections into the person’s medical record. If any other professional person who is authorized to release the person believes the person should be released before 30 days have elapsed, and the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment objects, the matter shall be referred to the medical director of the
 facility for the final decision. However, if the medical director is not a psychiatrist, he or she shall appoint a designee who is a psychiatrist. If the matter is referred, the person shall be released before 30 days have elapsed only if the psychiatrist believes, as a result of the psychiatrist’s personal observations, that the person no longer meets the criteria for certification, or is prepared to voluntarily accept treatment on referral or to remain on a voluntary basis in the facility providing intensive treatment.

(b) Any person who has been certified for 30 days of intensive treatment under this article, shall be released at the end of 30 days unless one or more of the following is applicable:

(1) The patient agrees to receive further treatment on a voluntary basis.

(2) The patient is the subject of a
 conservatorship petition filed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350).

(3) The patient is the subject of a petition for postcertification treatment of a dangerous person filed pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300).

(c) The amendments to this section made by Assembly Bill 348 of the 2003–04 Regular Session shall not be construed to revise or expand the scope of practice of psychologists, as defined in Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 94, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.40.

Any individual who is knowingly and willfully responsible for detaining a person for more than 30 days in violation of the provisions of Section 5270.35 is liable to that person in civil damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1517, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.45.

Whenever a county designates two or more facilities to provide intensive treatment and the person to be treated, his or her family, conservator, or guardian expresses a preference for one facility, the professional person certifying the person to be treated shall attempt, if administratively possible, to comply with the preference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1517, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.50.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5113, if the provisions of Section 5270.35 have been met, the professional person in charge of the facility providing intensive treatment, his or her designee, and the professional person directly responsible for the person’s treatment shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released before or at the end of 30 days pursuant to this article.

(b) The attorney or advocate representing the person, the court-appointed commissioner or referee, the certification review hearing officer conducting the certification review hearing, or the peace officer responsible for detaining the person shall not
 be civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released at or before the end of the 30 days of intensive treatment pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 703, Sec. 23.   (AB 2881)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.55.

(a) Whenever it is contemplated that a gravely disabled person may need to be detained beyond the end of the 14-day period of intensive treatment and prior to proceeding with an additional 30-day certification, the professional person in charge of the facility shall cause an evaluation to be made, based on the patient’s current condition and past history, as to whether it appears that the person, even after up to 30 days of additional treatment, is likely to qualify for appointment of a conservator. If the appointment of a conservator appears likely, the
 conservatorship referral shall be made during the 14-day period of intensive treatment.

(b) If it appears that with up to 30 days additional treatment a person is likely to reconstitute sufficiently to obviate the need for appointment of a conservator, then the person may be certified for the additional 30 days.

(c) When a conservatorship referral has not been made during the 14-day period and it appears during the 30-day certification that the person is likely to require the appointment of a conservator, or when a conservatorship referral has not been made during the initial 30-day period and it appears during a second consecutive 30-day period of intensive treatment approved by a court pursuant to Section 5270.70 that the person is likely to require the
 appointment of a conservator, then the conservatorship referral shall be made to allow sufficient time for conservatorship investigation and other related procedures. If a temporary conservatorship is obtained, it shall run concurrently with and not consecutively to the 30-day certification period. The conservatorship hearing shall be held by the 30th day of the certification period. The maximum involuntary detention period for gravely disabled persons pursuant to Sections 5150, 5250, and 5270.15 shall be limited to 77 days. This section does not prevent a person from exercising their right to a hearing as stated in Sections 5275 and 5353.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   (SB 1227)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.65.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit the professional person in charge of an intensive treatment facility, or a designee, from permitting a person certified for intensive treatment to leave the facility for short periods during the person’s intensive treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1517, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

5270.70.

(a) If, after 15 days of the 30-day period of intensive treatment pursuant to this article, but at least 7 days before expiration of the 30 days, the professional staff of the agency or facility treating the person finds that the person remains gravely disabled as a result of a mental disorder or impairment by chronic alcoholism and the person remains unwilling or unable to accept treatment voluntarily, the professional person in charge of the facility providing intensive treatment to the person may file a petition in the superior court for the county in which the facility providing intensive treatment is located, seeking approval
 for up to an additional 30 days of intensive treatment. The court shall immediately appoint the public defender or other attorney to represent the person in the hearing under this section, if that person does not already have counsel to represent them in the proceedings.

(b) Reasonable attempts shall be made by the mental health facility to notify family members or any other person designated by the patient of the time and place of the judicial review, unless the patient requests that this information not be provided. The patient shall be advised by the facility that is treating the patient that the patient has the right to request that this information not be provided.

(c) (1) The court shall either deny the petition or order an evidentiary hearing to be
 held within two court days after the petition is filed. The court may order that the person be held for up to an additional 30 days of intensive treatment if, at the evidentiary hearing, the court finds all of the following, based on the evidence presented:

(A) That the person, as a result of mental disorder or impairment by chronic alcoholism, is gravely disabled.

(B) That the person had been advised of the existence of, and has not accepted, voluntary treatment.

(C) That the facility providing intensive treatment is equipped and staffed to provide the required treatment and is designated by the
 county to provide intensive treatment

(D) That the person is likely to benefit from continued treatment.

(2) If the court does not make all of the findings required by paragraph (1), the person shall be released no later than the expiration of the original 30-day period.

(d) A finding under this section shall not be admissible in evidence in any civil proceeding without the consent of the person who was the subject of the finding.

(e) In no event may a person be held beyond the original 30-day period of intensive treatment unless a court has determined that an additional period of up to 30 days of treatment is required, regardless of whether or not the court hearing
 has been set.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 619, Sec. 2.   (SB 1227)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Judicial Review [5275. - 5278.]

5275.

Every person detained under this part shall have a right to a hearing by writ of habeas corpus for their release after they or any person acting on their behalf has made a request for release to either (a) the person delivering the copy of the notice of certification to the person certified at the time of the delivery, or (b) to any member of the treatment staff of the facility providing intensive treatment, at any time during treatment pursuant to this part.

Any person delivering a copy of the certification notice or any member of the treatment staff to whom a request for release is made shall promptly provide the person making the request for their signature or mark a copy of the form set forth below. The person delivering the copy of the certification notice or the member of the treatment staff, as the case
 may be, shall fill in their own name and the date, and, if the person signs by mark, shall fill in the person’s name, and shall then deliver the completed copy to the professional person in charge of the intensive treatment facility, or their designee, notifying them of the request. As soon as possible, the person notified shall inform the superior court for the county in which the facility is located of the request for release.

Any person who intentionally violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

The form for a request for release shall be substantially as follows:

(Name of the facility)___ day of ____ 20__

I, ____ (member of the treatment staff, or person delivering the copy of the certification notice), have today
 received a request for the release of ____ (name of patient) from the undersigned patient on the patient’s own behalf or from the undersigned person on behalf of the patient.Signature or mark of patient making request for 
releaseSignature or mark of person making request on 
behalf of patient

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 225.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5276.

Judicial review shall be in the superior court for the county in which the facility providing intensive treatment is located or in the county in which the 72-hour evaluation was conducted if the patient or a person acting in his or her behalf informs the professional staff of the evaluation facility (in writing) that judicial review will be sought. No patient shall be transferred from the county providing evaluation services to a different county for intensive treatment if the staff of the evaluation facility has been informed in writing that a judicial review will be sought, until the completion of the judicial review. The person requesting to be released
 shall be informed of his or her right to counsel by the member of the treatment staff and by the court; and, if he or she so elects, the court shall immediately appoint the public defender or other attorney to assist him or her in preparation of a petition for the writ of habeas corpus and, if he or she so elects, to represent him or her in the proceedings. The person shall pay the costs of the legal service if he or she is able.

Reasonable attempts shall be made by the mental health facility to notify family members or any other person designated by the patient, of the time and place of the judicial review, unless the patient requests that this information not be provided. The patient shall be advised by the facility that is treating the patient that he or she has the right to request that this information not be provided.

The court shall either release the person or order an evidentiary hearing to be held within two
 judicial days after the petition is filed. If the court finds, (a) that the person requesting release is not, as a result of mental disorder or impairment by chronic alcoholism, a danger to others, or to himself or herself, or gravely disabled, (b) that he or she had not been advised of, or had accepted, voluntary treatment, or (c) that the facility providing intensive treatment is not equipped and staffed to provide treatment, or is not designated by the county to provide intensive treatment he or she shall be released immediately.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 872, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

5276.1.

The person requesting release may, upon advice of counsel, waive the presence at the evidentiary hearing of the physician, licensed psychologist who meets the requirements of the first paragraph of Section 5251, or other professional person who certified the petition under Section 5251 and of the physician, or licensed psychologist who meets the requirements of the second paragraph of Section 5251, providing intensive treatment. In the event of such a waiver, such physician, licensed psychologist, or other professional person shall not be required to be present at the hearing if it is stipulated that the certification and records of such physicians,
 licensed psychologists, or other professional persons concerning the mental condition and treatment of the person regarding release will be received in evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1206, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5276.2.

In the event that the person, or anyone acting on his or her behalf, withdraws the request for judicial review, a certification review hearing shall be held within four days of the withdrawal of the request, and the procedures in Sections 5255 to 5256.8, inclusive, shall be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1598, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5277.

A finding under Section 5276 shall not be admissible in evidence in any civil or criminal proceeding without the consent of the person who was the subject of the finding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 722.)
-------------------------------------------

5278.

Individuals authorized under this part to detain a person for 72-hour treatment and evaluation pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 5150) or Article 2 (commencing with Section 5200), or to certify a person for intensive treatment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 5250) or Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 5260) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 5270.10) or to file a petition for post-certification treatment for a person pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) shall not be held either criminally or civilly liable for exercising this authority in accordance with the law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1517, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Postcertification Procedures for Imminently Dangerous Persons [5300. - 5309.]

5300.

(a) At the expiration of the 14-day period of intensive treatment, a person may be confined for further treatment pursuant to the provisions of this article for an additional period, not to exceed 180 days if one of the following exists:

(1) The person has attempted, inflicted, or made a serious threat of substantial physical harm upon the person of another after having been taken into custody, and while in custody, for evaluation and treatment, and who, as a result of a mental health disorder, presents a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others.

(2) The
 person had attempted, or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another, that act having resulted in the person being taken into custody and who presents, as a result of a mental health disorder, a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others.

(3) The person had made a serious threat of substantial physical harm upon the person of another within seven days of being taken into custody, that threat having at least in part resulted in the person being taken into custody, and the person presents, as a result of a mental health disorder, a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others.

(b) A commitment to a licensed health facility under this article places an affirmative obligation on the facility to provide treatment for
 the underlying causes of the person’s mental health disorder.

(c) Amenability to treatment is not required for a finding that a person is a person as described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a). Treatment programs need only be made available to these persons. Treatment does not mean that the treatment must be successful or potentially successful, and it does not mean that the person must recognize the person’s problem and willingly participate in the treatment program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 9, Sec. 22.   (AB 46)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

5300.5.

For purposes of this article:

(a) “Custody” shall be construed to mean involuntary detainment under the provisions of this part uninterrupted by any period of unconditioned release from a licensed health facility providing involuntary care and treatment.

(b) Conviction of a crime is not necessary for commitment under this article. 

(c) Demonstrated danger may be based on assessment of present mental condition, which is based upon a consideration of past
 behavior of the person within six years prior to the time the person attempted, inflicted, or threatened physical harm upon another, and other relevant evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 754, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

5301.

(a) At any time during the 14-day intensive treatment period the professional person in charge of the licensed health facility, or his or her designee, may ask the public officer required by Section 5114 to present evidence at proceedings under this article to petition the superior court in the county in which the licensed health facility providing treatment is located for an order requiring the person to undergo an additional period of treatment on the grounds set forth in Section 5300. This petition shall summarize the facts that support the contention that the person falls within the standard set forth in Section 5300. The petition shall be supported by affidavits describing in detail the behavior that indicates that the person falls within the standard set forth in Section 5300.

(b) Copies of the petition for postcertification treatment and the affidavits in support thereof shall be served upon the person named in the petition on the same day as they are filed with the clerk of the superior court.

(c) The petition shall be in the following form:

Petition for Postcertification Treatment of a Dangerous Person

I, ____, (the professional person in charge of the ____ intensive treatment facility) (the designee of ____ the professional person in charge of the ____, treatment facility) in which ____ has been under treatment pursuant to the certification by ____ and ____, hereby petition the court for an order requiring ____ to undergo an additional period of treatment, not to exceed 180 days, pursuant to the provisions of
 Article 6 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. This petition is based upon my allegation that (a) ____ has attempted, inflicted, or made a serious threat of substantial physical harm upon the person of another after having been taken into custody, and while in custody, for evaluation, and that, by reason of mental health disorder, presents a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others, or that (b) ____ had attempted or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another, that act having resulted in his or her being taken into custody, and that he or she presents, as a result of mental health disorder, a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others, or that (c) ____ had made a serious threat of substantial physical harm upon the person of another within seven days of being taken into custody, that threat having at least in part resulted in his or her being taken into custody, and that he
 or she presents, as a result of mental health disorder, a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others.

My allegation is based upon the following facts:This allegation is supported by the accompanying affidavits signed by ____________.Signed 
(d) The courts may receive the affidavits in evidence and may allow the affidavits to be read to the jury and the contents thereof considered in rendering a verdict, unless counsel for the person named in the petition subpoenas the treating professional person. If the treating professional person is subpoenaed to testify, the public officer, pursuant to Section 5114, shall be entitled to a continuance of the hearing or trial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 90.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5302.

At the time of filing of a petition for postcertification treatment the court shall advise the person named in the petition of his right to be represented by an attorney and of his right to demand a jury trial. The court shall assist him in finding an attorney, or, if need be, appoint an attorney if the person is unable to obtain counsel. The court shall appoint the public defender or other attorney to represent the person named in the petition if the person is financially unable to provide his own attorney. The attorney shall advise the person of his rights in relation to the proceeding and shall represent him before the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1627.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.

The court shall conduct the proceedings on the petition for postcertification treatment within four judicial days of the filing of the petition and in accordance with constitutional guarantees of due process of law and the procedures required under Section 13 of Article 1 of the Constitution of the State of California.

If at the time of the hearing the person named in the petition requests a jury trial, such trial shall commence within 10 judicial days of the filing of the petition for postcertification treatment unless the person’s attorney requests a continuance, which may be for a maximum of 10 additional judicial days. The
 decison of the jury must be unanimous in order to support the finding of facts required by Section 5304.

Until a final decision on the merits by the trial court the person named in the petition shall continue to be treated in the intensive treatment facility until released by order of the superior court having jurisdiction over the action, or unless the petition for postcertification treatment is withdrawn. If no decision has been made within 30 days after the filing of the petition, not including extensions of time requested by the person’s attorney, the person shall be released.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

5303.1.

For the purposes of any hearing or jury trial held pursuant to this article, the judge of the court in which such hearing or trial is held may appoint a psychiatrist or psychologist with forensic skills. Such psychiatrist or psychologist shall personally examine the person named in the petition. Such a forensic psychiatrist or psychologist shall testify at the hearing or jury trial concerning the mental condition of the person named in the petition and the threat of substantial physical harm to other beings such person presents, and neither the professional person or his designee who petitioned for the additional period of treatment nor of the physicians providing
 intensive treatment shall be required, unless the person named in the petition chooses to subpoena such persons, to be present at the hearing or jury trial.

If a psychiatrist or psychologist with forensic skills is not appointed pursuant to this section the person named in the petition may, upon advice of counsel, waive the presence at the hearing or at the jury trial of the professional person or his designee who petitioned for the additional period of treatment and the physicians providing intensive treatment. In the event of such waiver, such professional person, his designee, or other physicians shall not be required to be present at the hearing if it is stipulated that the certification, supporting affidavit and records of such physicians concerning the mental condition of the person named in the petition will be received in evidence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 960.)
-------------------------------------------

5304.

(a) The court shall remand a person named in the petition for postcertification treatment to the custody of the State Department of State Hospitals or to a licensed health facility designated by the county of residence of that person for a further period of intensive treatment, not to exceed 180 days from the date of court judgment, if the court or jury finds that the person named in the petition for postcertification treatment has done any of the following:

(1) Attempted, inflicted, or made a serious threat of substantial physical harm upon the person of another after having been taken into custody, and while in custody, for evaluation and treatment, and who, as a result of mental health disorder, presents a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical
 harm upon others.

(2) Attempted or inflicted physical harm upon the person of another, that act having resulted in his or her being taken into custody, and who, as a result of mental health disorder, presents a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others.

(3) Expressed a serious threat of substantial physical harm upon the person of another within seven days of being taken into custody, that threat having at least in part resulted in his or her being taken into custody, and who presents, as a result of mental health disorder, a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others.

(b) The person shall be released from involuntary treatment at the expiration of 180 days unless the public officer, pursuant to Section 5114, files a new petition for postcertification
 treatment on the grounds that he or she has attempted, inflicted, or made a serious threat of substantial physical harm upon another during his or her period of postcertification treatment, and he or she is a person who by reason of mental health disorder, presents a demonstrated danger of inflicting substantial physical harm upon others. The new petition for postcertification treatment shall be filed in the superior court in which the original petition for postcertification was filed.

(c) The county from which the person was remanded shall bear any transportation costs incurred pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 91.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5305.

(a) Any person committed pursuant to Section 5300 may be placed on outpatient status if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) In the evaluation of the superintendent or professional person in charge of the licensed health facility, the person named in the petition will no longer be a danger to the health and safety of others while on outpatient status and will benefit from outpatient status.

(2) The county behavioral health director advises the court that the person named in the petition will benefit from outpatient status and identifies an appropriate program of supervision and treatment.

(b) After actual notice to the public officer, pursuant to Section 5114, and to counsel of the person named in the petition, to the court and to the county behavioral health director, the plan for outpatient treatment shall become effective within five judicial days unless a court hearing on that action is requested by any of the aforementioned parties, in which case the release on outpatient status shall not take effect until approved by the court after a hearing. This hearing shall be held within five judicial days of the actual notice required by this subdivision.

(c) The county behavioral health director shall be the outpatient supervisor of persons placed on outpatient status under this section. The county behavioral health director may delegate outpatient supervision responsibility to a designee.

(d) The
 outpatient treatment supervisor shall, when the person is placed on outpatient status at least three months, submit at 90-day intervals to the court, the public officer, pursuant to Section 5114, and counsel of the person named in the petition and to the supervisor or professional person in charge of the licensed health facility, when appropriate, a report setting forth the status and progress of the person named in the petition. Notwithstanding the length of the outpatient status, a final report shall be submitted by the outpatient treatment supervisor at the conclusion of the 180-day commitment setting forth the status and progress of the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 22.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5306.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5113, if the provisions of Section 5309 have been met, the superintendent, the professional person in charge of the hospital providing 90-day involuntary treatment, the medical director of the facility or his or her designee described in subdivision (a) of Section 5309, and the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released before the end of a 90-day period pursuant to this article.

(b) The superintendent, the
 professional person in charge of the hospital providing 90-day involuntary treatment, the medical director of the facility or his or her designee described in subdivision (a) of Section 5309, and the psychiatrist directly responsible for the person’s treatment shall not be held civilly or criminally liable for any action by a person released at the end of a 90-day period pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1288, Sec. 11.   Effective September 30, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

5306.5.

(a) If at any time during the outpatient period, the outpatient treatment supervisor is of the opinion that the person receiving treatment requires extended inpatient treatment or refuses to accept further outpatient treatment and supervision, the county behavioral health director shall notify the superior court in either the county that approved outpatient status or in the county where outpatient treatment is being provided of that opinion by means of a written request for revocation of outpatient status. The county behavioral health director shall furnish a copy of this request to the counsel of the person named in the request for revocation and to the public officer, pursuant to Section 5114, in both counties if the request is made in the county of treatment, rather than the county
 of commitment.

(b) Within 15 judicial days, the court where the request was filed shall hold a hearing and shall either approve or disapprove the request for revocation of outpatient status. If the court approves the request for revocation, the court shall order that the person be confined in a state hospital or other treatment facility approved by the county behavioral health director. The court shall transmit a copy of its order to the county behavioral health director or a designee and to the Director of State Hospitals. When the county of treatment and the county of commitment differ and revocation occurs in the county of treatment, the court shall enter the name of the committing county and its case number on the order of revocation and shall send a copy of the order to the committing court and the public officer, pursuant to Section 5114, and counsel of the person named in the request for revocation in the county of
 commitment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 23.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5307.
